Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-18] Judicial enforcement of
pre-award ruling by arbitrator. If an arbitrator makes a pre-award ruling
in favor of a party to the arbitration proceeding, the party may request the
arbitrator to incorporate the ruling into an award under section 658A-19. A
prevailing party may make a motion to the court for an expedited order to
confirm the award under section 658A-22, in which case the court shall
summarily decide the motion. The court shall issue an order to confirm the
award unless the court vacates, modifies, or corrects the award under section
658A-23 or 658A-24. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next